Maryland, session 2025, HB0042.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:

HOUSE BILL 42 3
Article – Agriculture
2–109.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “GRANT PROGRAM” MEANS THE ON–FARM ORGANICS
DIVERSION AND RECYCLING GRANT PROGRAM.
(3) “URBAN AGRICULTURAL PRODUCER” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 2–2001 OF THIS TITLE.
(4) “URBAN FARMER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 2–401 OF THIS
TITLE.
(B) THERE BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, THERE IS AN ON–FARM ORGANICS
DIVERSION AND RECYCLING GRANT PROGRAM IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE GRANT PROGRAM IS TO AWARD GRANTS
ANNUALLY FOR DEVELOPING AND IMPLEMENTING ON–FARM ORGANICS RECYCLING
AND COMPOST USE, WASTED FOOD PREVENTION, AND FOOD RESCUE.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF THE
ENVIRONMENT, SHALL ADMINISTER THE GRANT PROGRAM.
(E) THE FOLLOWING PERSONS ARE ELIGIBLE FOR A GRANT UNDER THE
GRANT PROGRAM:
(1) A FARMER, AN URBAN FARMER, OR AN URBAN AGRICULTURAL
PRODUCER;
(2) A SOIL CONSERVATION DISTRICT;
(3) AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION AS DEFINED IN § 10–101
OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE;
(4) A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION;
(5) A BUSINESS IN THE STATE THAT IS IN:
(I) GOOD STANDING WITH THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF
ASSESSMENTS AND TAXATION; AND

HOUSE BILL 42
(II) PARTNERSHIP WITH A FARMER, AN URBAN FARMER, OR AN
URBAN AGRICULTURAL PRODUCER; AND
(6) A CONSORTIUM OF ANY ENTITIES UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(F) A PROJECT IS ELIGIBLE FOR A GRANT UNDER THE GRANT PROGRAM IF
THE PROJECT DEVELOPS, MAINTAINS, OR EXPANDS INFRASTRUCTURE, COLLECTION
PROGRAMS, EDUCATION, OR TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE IN THE STATE THAT:
(1) REDUCES THE AMOUNT OF WASTED FOOD GENERATED;
(2) RESCUES EDIBLE FOOD FOR PURPOSES OF REDISTRIBUTION;
(3) RECOVERS WASTED FOOD AS ANIMAL FEED IF THE FEED IS
REGISTERED AND TREATED IN ACCORDANCE WITH REGULATIONS IMPLEMENTED BY
THE DEPARTMENT;
(4) COMPOSTS OR RECYCLES FOOD RESIDUALS THAT ARE
SEPARATED FROM PACKAGING PRIOR TO COLLECTION, INCLUDING AT–HOME,
COMMUNITY, AND ON–FARM COMPOSTING;
(5) PROVIDES LABOR AND WAGES IN SUPPORT OF WASTED FOOD
PREVENTION, FOOD RESCUE, AND ON–FARM ORGANICS RECYCLING AND COMPOST
USE;
(6) PROVIDES BEST MANAGEMENT PRACTICE TRAINING IN
RELEVANT FIELDS BY A REPUTABLE TRAINING PROGRAM;
(7) STUDIES THE IMPACTS OF COMPOST APPLICATION ON ON–FARM
NUTRIENT AND WATER QUALITY MANAGEMENT; OR
(8) ASSISTS IN THE PAYMENT OF APPLICABLE PERMIT APPLICATION
COSTS.
(G) IN AWARDING GRANTS UNDER THE GRANT PROGRAM, THE
DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT,
SHALL PRIORITIZE PROJECTS:
(1) FOR WHICH THE APPLICANT CLEARLY DESCRIBES HOW THE
PROJECT WILL:
(I) PROVIDE DIRECT, MEANINGFUL, AND ASSURED BENEFITS
TO THE COMMUNITY; AND

HOUSE BILL 42 5
(II) ADDRESS IMPORTANT COMMUNITY NEEDS;
(2) THAT PREVENT, RESCUE, AND DIVERT WASTED FOOD WITHIN A
LOCAL COMMUNITY;
(3) THAT PLAN TO PRODUCE COMPOST THAT MEETS THE
CLASSIFICATION OF “GENERAL USE” UNDER COMAR 15.18.04.05;
(4) THAT PLAN TO PRODUCE MINIMALLY CONTAMINATED COMPOST
THROUGH:
(I) PROCESSING ORGANIC MATERIALS THAT ARE SEPARATED
FROM PACKAGING PRIOR TO COLLECTION;
(II) NOT USING DEPACKAGERS; AND
(III) MEETING THE U.S. COMPOSTING COUNCIL’S SEAL OF
TESTING ASSURANCE;
(5) THAT SERVE AN OVERBURDENED OR UNDERSERVED COMMUNITY
AS DEFINED IN § 1–701 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE;
(6) THAT MINIMIZE NEGATIVE IMPACTS TO THE LOCAL COMMUNITY;
AND
(7) THAT MAXIMIZE BENEFITS TO THE LOCAL COMMUNITY,
INCLUDING:
(I) THE CREATION OF JOBS;
(II) INCREASING JOB TRAINING; AND
(III) INCREASING HIRING AND LEADERSHIP DEVELOPMENT
PRACTICES THAT ARE INCLUSIVE AND PROVIDE A LIVING WAGE.
(H) AN ELIGIBLE PERSON THAT RECEIVES A GRANT UNDER THE GRANT
PROGRAM MAY NOT RECEIVE A GRANT UNDER THE WASTED FOOD REDUCTION AND
DIVERSION GRANT PROGRAM UNDER § 9–1725.3 9–1725.1 OF THE ENVIRONMENT
ARTICLE IN THE SAME CALENDAR YEAR.
(I) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2027, AND EACH DECEMBER 31
THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON:

HOUSE BILL 42
(1) THE NUMBER AND TYPES OF GRANTS AWARDED;
(2) THE IMPACT OF THE GRANTS ON THE CREATION OF JOBS AND
OTHER BENEFITS TO THE STATE;
(3) THE IMPACT ON FOOD WASTE PREVENTED, RESCUED, AND
DIVERTED FROM DISPOSAL; AND
(4) THE IMPACT ON FARMERS, URBAN FARMERS, AND URBAN
AGRICULTURAL PRODUCERS IN THE STATE.
2–401.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(3) “Urban farmer” means an individual who farms in an urban area.
2–2001.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(f) “Urban agricultural producer” means any person that annually sells, or
normally would have sold, $1,000 or more of farm products in an urban area.
(g) “Urban area” means an area of the State that is:
(1) Delineated as an urban area by the U.S. Census Bureau; or
(2) Within the boundaries of a municipal corporation.
Article – Environment
1–701.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(7) “Overburdened community” means any census tract for which three or
more of the following environmental health indicators are above the 75th percentile
statewide:
(i) Particulate matter (PM) 2.5;
(ii) Ozone;
(iii) National Air Toxics Assessment (NATA) diesel PM;

HOUSE BILL 42 7
(iv) NATA cancer risk;
(v) NATA respiratory hazard index;
(vi) Traffic proximity;
(vii) Lead paint indicator;
(viii) National Priorities List Superfund site proximity;
(ix) Risk Management Plan facility proximity;
(x) Hazardous waste proximity;
(xi) Wastewater discharge indicator;
(xii) Proximity to a Concentrated Animal Feeding Operation (CAFO);
(xiii) Percent of the population lacking broadband coverage;
(xiv) Asthma emergency room discharges;
(xv) Myocardial infarction discharges;
(xvi) Low–birth–weight infants;
(xvii) Proximity to emitting power plants;
(xviii) Proximity to a Toxic Release Inventory (TRI) facility;
(xix) Proximity to a brownfields site;
(xx) Proximity to mining operations; and
(xxi) Proximity to a hazardous waste landfill.
(8) “Underserved community” means any census tract in which, according
to the most recent U.S. Census Bureau Survey:
(i) At least 25% of the residents qualify as low–income;
(ii) At least 50% of the residents identify as nonwhite; or
(iii) At least 15% of the residents have limited English proficiency.
9–201.

HOUSE BILL 42
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) “Refuse disposal system” includes:
(1) An incinerator;
(2) A transfer station;
(3) A landfill system;
(4) A landfill;
(5) A solid waste processing facility; and
(6) Any other solid waste acceptance facility.
9–1725.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “REFUSE DISPOSAL SYSTEM” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 9–201 OF THIS TITLE.
(B) (1) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026, THERE IS A SOLID WASTE DISPOSAL
SURCHARGE ON THE FINAL DISPOSAL OF SOLID WASTE IN REFUSE DISPOSAL
SYSTEMS IN THE STATE.
(2) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE SOLID
WASTE DISPOSAL SURCHARGE IS $2 PER TON OF SOLID WASTE PROCESSED BY A
REFUSE DISPOSAL SYSTEM FOR FINAL DISPOSAL.
(3) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2028, AND EVERY 2 YEARS THEREAFTER,
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(I) ADJUST THE SOLID WASTE DISPOSAL SURCHARGE IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE CONSUMER PRICE INDEX FOR THE MID–ATLANTIC
DIVISION; AND
(II) EVALUATE THE SOLID WASTE DISPOSAL SURCHARGE TO
DETERMINE IF ADDITIONAL ADJUSTMENTS TO THE SURCHARGE ARE REQUIRED.
(4) IF THE SURCHARGE HAS BEEN ASSESSED ON AN ELIGIBLE OWNER
OR OPERATOR OF A TRANSFER STATION, THE SOLID WASTE DISPOSAL SURCHARGE
MAY NOT BE ASSESSED ON AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A REFUSE DISPOSAL SYSTEM
THAT RECEIVES THE SOLID WASTE FOR FINAL DISPOSAL.

HOUSE BILL 42 9
(5) AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A REFUSE DISPOSAL SYSTEM SHALL
COLLECT THE SURCHARGE REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION BY INCLUDING THE
SURCHARGE AMOUNT DUE AS A SEPARATE LINE ITEM ON EVERY CUSTOMER BILL
PRESENTED TO A SOLID WASTE COLLECTOR OR GENERATOR.
(6) A SOLID WASTE HAULER OR COLLECTOR MAY COLLECT RATES,
FEES, OR SURCHARGES FROM SOLID WASTE GENERATORS SERVICED BY THE SOLID
WASTE HAULER OR COLLECTOR IN AN AMOUNT SUFFICIENT TO RECOVER THE
SURCHARGE COLLECTED BY THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A REFUSE DISPOSAL
SYSTEM.
(C) (1) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL COLLECT THE SURCHARGE ASSESSED
UNDER THIS SECTION AND DEPOSIT THE SURCHARGE INTO THE WASTED FOOD
REDUCTION AND DIVERSION FUND UNDER § 9–1725.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) (I) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, AND EVERY QUARTER
THEREAFTER, THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A REFUSE DISPOSAL SYSTEM IN THE
STATE SHALL SUBMIT, UNDER OATH, THE SUM OF SURCHARGES COLLECTED IN THE
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING QUARTER TO THE COMPTROLLER.
(II) IN ADDITION TO THE SURCHARGES SUBMITTED TO THE
COMPTROLLER UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE OWNER OR
OPERATOR OF A REFUSE DISPOSAL SYSTEM SHALL SUBMIT, AS APPLICABLE, AN
ACCOUNTING OF THE NUMBER OF TONS OF SOLID WASTE ACCEPTED FOR DISPOSAL,
TRANSFER, OR COLLECTION DURING THE REPORTING PERIOD.
9–1725.2.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FUND” MEANS THE WASTED FOOD REDUCTION AND
DIVERSION FUND.
(B) THERE IS A WASTED FOOD REDUCTION AND DIVERSION FUND.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO FUND ELIGIBLE PROJECTS UNDER
THE ON–FARM ORGANICS DIVERSION AND RECYCLING GRANT PROGRAM
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 2–109 OF THE AGRICULTURE ARTICLE, THE WASTED FOOD
REDUCTION AND DIVERSION GRANT PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER §
9–1725.3 OF THIS SUBTITLE, AND THE COUNTY WASTED FOOD REDUCTION BLOCK
GRANT PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–1725.4 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) THE SECRETARY SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(E) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 42
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) REVENUE DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND UNDER § 9–1725.1 OF THIS
SUBTITLE;
(2) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
(3) INTEREST EARNINGS; AND
(4) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(G) (1) (I) NOT MORE THAN 25% OF THE FUND MAY BE USED FOR
ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES JOINTLY BY THE DEPARTMENT AND THE DEPARTMENT
OF AGRICULTURE EACH FISCAL YEAR.
(II) NOT MORE THAN 0.5% OF THE FUND MAY BE USED FOR
ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES BY THE COMPTROLLER EACH FISCAL YEAR.
(2) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, AND EACH JULY 1 THEREAFTER, THE
COMPTROLLER SHALL TRANSFER THE REMAINING MONEY FROM THE FUND AFTER
ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION AS
FOLLOWS:
(I) 25% TO THE WASTED FOOD REDUCTION AND DIVERSION
GRANT PROGRAM UNDER § 9–1725.3 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(II) 25% TO THE ON–FARM ORGANICS DIVERSION AND
RECYCLING GRANT PROGRAM UNDER § 2–109 OF THE AGRICULTURE ARTICLE;
AND
(III) 50% TO THE COUNTY WASTED FOOD REDUCTION BLOCK
GRANT PROGRAM UNDER § 9–1725.4 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(H) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE FUND.

HOUSE BILL 42 11
(I) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(J) MONEY EXPENDED FROM THE FUND FOR THE WASTED FOOD
REDUCTION AND DIVERSION GRANT PROGRAM, THE ON–FARM ORGANICS
DIVERSION AND RECYCLING GRANT PROGRAM, AND THE COUNTY WASTED FOOD
REDUCTION BLOCK GRANT PROGRAM IS SUPPLEMENTAL TO AND IS NOT INTENDED
TO TAKE THE PLACE OF FUNDING THAT OTHERWISE WOULD BE APPROPRIATED FOR
THOSE PROGRAMS.
9–1725.3.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “GRANT PROGRAM” MEANS THE WASTED FOOD REDUCTION AND
DIVERSION GRANT PROGRAM.
(3) “OVERBURDENED COMMUNITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
1–701 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(4) “UNDERSERVED COMMUNITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
1–701 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(5) “URBAN AGRICULTURAL PRODUCER” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 2–2001 OF THE AGRICULTURE ARTICLE.
(6) “URBAN FARMER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 2–401 OF THE
AGRICULTURE ARTICLE.
(B) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, THERE IS A WASTED FOOD REDUCTION AND
DIVERSION GRANT PROGRAM IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE GRANT PROGRAM IS TO AWARD GRANTS
ANNUALLY FOR INFRASTRUCTURE, PROGRAMS, AND EDUCATION THAT REDUCE,
RESCUE, AND DIVERT WASTED FOOD IN THE STATE.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF
AGRICULTURE, SHALL ADMINISTER THE GRANT PROGRAM.
(E) THE FOLLOWING PERSONS ARE ELIGIBLE FOR A GRANT UNDER THE
GRANT PROGRAM:
(1) A UNIT OF STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT;

HOUSE BILL 42
(2) A LOCAL EDUCATION AGENCY;
(3) AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION AS DEFINED IN § 10–101
OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE;
(4) A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION;
(5) A FARMER, AN URBAN FARMER, OR AN URBAN AGRICULTURAL
PRODUCER;
(6) A BUSINESS IN THE STATE THAT IS IN GOOD STANDING WITH THE
STATE DEPARTMENT OF ASSESSMENTS AND TAXATION; AND
(7) A CONSORTIUM OF ANY ENTITIES UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(F) A PROJECT IS ELIGIBLE FOR A GRANT UNDER THE GRANT PROGRAM IF
THE PROJECT DEVELOPS, MAINTAINS, OR EXPANDS INFRASTRUCTURE, COLLECTION
PROGRAMS, EDUCATION, OR TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE IN THE STATE THAT:
(1) REDUCES THE AMOUNT OF WASTED FOOD GENERATED;
(2) RESCUES EDIBLE FOOD FOR PURPOSES OF REDISTRIBUTION;
(3) RECOVERS WASTED FOOD AS ANIMAL FEED IF THE FEED IS
REGISTERED AND TREATED IN ACCORDANCE WITH REGULATIONS IMPLEMENTED BY
THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE;
(4) COMPOSTS OR RECYCLES FOOD RESIDUALS THAT ARE
SEPARATED FROM PACKAGING PRIOR TO COLLECTION, INCLUDING
AT–HOME, COMMUNITY, AND ON–FARM COMPOSTING; OR
(5) TRANSITIONS FROM SINGLE–USE FOOD SERVICEWARE TO
DURABLE AND REUSABLE FOOD SERVICEWARE.
(G) IN AWARDING GRANTS UNDER THE GRANT PROGRAM, THE
DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE,
SHALL PRIORITIZE PROJECTS:
(1) FOR WHICH THE APPLICANT CLEARLY DESCRIBES HOW THE
PROJECT WILL:
(I) PROVIDE DIRECT, MEANINGFUL, AND ASSURED BENEFITS
TO THE COMMUNITY; AND

HOUSE BILL 42 13
(II) ADDRESS IMPORTANT COMMUNITY NEEDS;
(2) THAT PREVENT, RESCUE, AND DIVERT WASTED FOOD WITHIN A
LOCAL COMMUNITY;
(3) THAT PLAN TO PRODUCE COMPOST THAT MEETS THE
CLASSIFICATION OF “GENERAL USE” UNDER COMAR 15.18.04.05;
(4) THAT PLAN TO PRODUCE MINIMALLY CONTAMINATED COMPOST
THROUGH:
(I) PROCESSING ORGANIC MATERIALS THAT ARE SEPARATED
FROM PACKAGING PRIOR TO COLLECTION;
(II) NOT USING DEPACKAGERS; AND
(III) MEETING THE U.S. COMPOSTING COUNCIL’S SEAL OF
TESTING ASSURANCE;
(5) THAT SERVE AN OVERBURDENED OR UNDERSERVED COMMUNITY;
(6) THAT MINIMIZE NEGATIVE IMPACTS TO THE LOCAL COMMUNITY;
AND
(7) THAT MAXIMIZE BENEFITS TO THE LOCAL COMMUNITY,
INCLUDING:
(I) THE CREATION OF JOBS;
(II) INCREASING JOB TRAINING; AND
(III) INCREASING HIRING AND LEADERSHIP DEVELOPMENT
PRACTICES THAT ARE INCLUSIVE AND PROVIDE A LIVING WAGE.
(H) AN ELIGIBLE PERSON THAT RECEIVES A GRANT UNDER THE GRANT
PROGRAM MAY NOT RECEIVE A GRANT UNDER THE ON–FARM ORGANICS
DIVERSION AND RECYCLING GRANT PROGRAM UNDER § 2–109 OF THE
AGRICULTURE ARTICLE IN THE SAME CALENDAR YEAR.
(I) (1) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT
OF AGRICULTURE, SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THIS SECTION.
(2) REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL
INCLUDE:

HOUSE BILL 42
(I) A SIMPLE COMMON APPLICATION PROCEDURE; AND
(II) FOR ELIGIBLE ENTITIES, A PROCESS TO FACILITATE THE
PARTICIPATION OF ELIGIBLE ENTITIES THAT HAVE LIMITED RESOURCES OR
LANGUAGE BARRIERS.
(J) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2027, AND EACH DECEMBER 31
THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON:
(1) THE NUMBER AND TYPES OF GRANTS AWARDED;
(2) THE IMPACT OF THE GRANTS ON THE CREATION OF JOBS AND
OTHER BENEFITS TO THE STATE;
(3) THE IMPACT ON WASTE PREVENTED, RESCUED, AND DIVERTED
FROM DISPOSAL; AND
(4) THE IMPACT ON FARMERS, URBAN FARMERS, AND URBAN
AGRICULTURAL PRODUCERS IN THE STATE.
9–1725.4. 9–1725.2.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “GRANT PROGRAM” MEANS THE COUNTY WASTED FOOD
REDUCTION BLOCK GRANT PROGRAM.
(3) “OVERBURDENED COMMUNITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
1–701 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(4) “UNDERSERVED COMMUNITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
1–701 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(5) “URBAN AGRICULTURAL PRODUCER” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 2–2001 OF THE AGRICULTURE ARTICLE.
(6) “URBAN FARMER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 2–401 OF THE
AGRICULTURE ARTICLE.
(B) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, THERE IS A COUNTY WASTED FOOD
REDUCTION BLOCK GRANT PROGRAM IN THE DEPARTMENT.

HOUSE BILL 42 15
(C) (1) THE PURPOSE OF THE GRANT PROGRAM IS TO AWARD GRANTS TO
COUNTIES ANNUALLY IN AMOUNTS PROPORTIONAL TO EACH COUNTY’S
POPULATION.
(2) FUNDS RECEIVED BY A COUNTY UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL
FUND PROJECTS TO DEVELOP, MAINTAIN, OR EXPAND INFRASTRUCTURE,
PROGRAMS, AND EDUCATION THAT REDUCE, RESCUE, AND DIVERT WASTED FOOD IN
THE COUNTY.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF
AGRICULTURE, SHALL ADMINISTER THE GRANT PROGRAM.
(E) IN FUNDING PROJECTS UNDER THE GRANT PROGRAM, A COUNTY SHALL
PRIORITIZE PROJECTS THAT:
(1) PROVIDE DIRECT, MEANINGFUL, AND ASSURED BENEFITS TO THE
COMMUNITY;
(2) ADDRESS IMPORTANT COMMUNITY NEEDS;
(3) PREVENT, RESCUE, AND DIVERT WASTED FOOD WITHIN A LOCAL
COMMUNITY;
(4) PLAN TO PRODUCE COMPOST THAT MEETS THE CLASSIFICATION
OF “GENERAL USE” UNDER COMAR 15.18.04.05;
(5) PLAN TO PRODUCE MINIMALLY CONTAMINATED COMPOST
THROUGH:
(I) PROCESSING ORGANIC MATERIALS THAT ARE SEPARATED
FROM PACKAGING PRIOR TO COLLECTION;
(II) NOT USING DEPACKAGERS; AND
(III) MEETING THE U.S. COMPOSTING COUNCIL’S SEAL OF
TESTING ASSURANCE;
(6) SERVE AN OVERBURDENED OR UNDERSERVED COMMUNITY;
(7) MINIMIZE NEGATIVE IMPACTS TO THE LOCAL COMMUNITY; AND
(8) MAXIMIZE BENEFITS TO THE LOCAL COMMUNITY, INCLUDING:
(I) THE CREATION OF JOBS;

HOUSE BILL 42
(II) INCREASING JOB TRAINING; AND
(III) INCREASING HIRING AND LEADERSHIP DEVELOPMENT
PRACTICES THAT ARE INCLUSIVE AND PROVIDE A LIVING WAGE.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) 1. This subparagraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024
through 2028.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(ii) The provisions of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph do not apply
to the following funds:
204. the Victims of Domestic Violence Program Grant Fund;
[and]
205. the Proposed Programs Collaborative Grant Fund; AND
206. THE WASTED FOOD REDUCTION AND DIVERSION
FUND.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, notwithstanding any other
provision of law, the Governor may transfer $3,000,000 in fiscal years 2027 through 2031
from the Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund established under § 9–20B–05 of the
State Government Article to each of the following programs, as enacted by Section 1 of this
Act:
(1) the On–Farm Organics Diversion and Recycling Grant Program under
§ 2–109 of the Agriculture Article;
(2) the Wasted Food Reduction and Diversion Grant Program under §
9–1725.1 of the Environment Article; and
(3) the County Wasted Food Reduction Block Grant Program under §
9–1725.2 of the Environment Article.

HOUSE BILL 42 17
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.